Washington statutes.
RCW 35.56.190

Tax levy—General—Purposes—Limit.

For the purpose of raising revenues to carry on any project under this chapter including funds for the payment for the lands taken, purchased, acquired or condemned and the expenses incident to the acquiring thereof, or any other cost or expenses incurred by the city under the provisions of this chapter but not including the cost of actually filling the lands for which the local improvement district was created, a city may levy an annual tax of not exceeding seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation of all property within the city. The city council or commission may create a fund into which all moneys so derived from taxation and moneys derived from rents and issues of the lands shall be paid and against which special fund warrants may be drawn or negotiable bonds issued to meet expenditures under this chapter.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 22; 1965 c 7 s 35.56.190. Prior: 1913 c 16 s 19; RRS s 9467.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.